Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,127
Emergency; proclamation; President of United States; Governor; effect.

The officers of a financial institution may close any one or all of the financial institution's offices on any day, designated by proclamation of the President of the United States or the Governor, as a day or days of mourning, rejoicing, or other special observance.

Laws 1971, LB 523, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 119.